Illinois, session 104th, HB4092.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 5-105 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/5-105)  (from Ch. 110, par. 5-105)7    Sec. 5-105. Waiver of court fees, costs, and charges. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9        (1) "Fees, costs, and charges" means payments imposed 10    on a party in connection with the prosecution or defense 11    of a civil action, including, but not limited to: fees set 12    forth in Section 27.1b of the Clerks of Courts Act; fees 13    for service of process and other papers served either 14    within or outside this State, including service by 15    publication pursuant to Section 2-206 of this Code and 16    publication of necessary legal notices; motion fees; 17    charges for participation in, or attendance at, any 18    mandatory process or procedure including, but not limited 19    to, conciliation, mediation, arbitration, counseling, 20    evaluation, "Children First", "Focus on Children" or 21    similar programs; fees for supplementary proceedings; 22    charges for translation services; guardian ad litem fees; 23    and all other processes and procedures deemed by the court   HB4092- 2 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1    to be necessary to commence, prosecute, defend, or enforce 2    relief in a civil action.3        (2) "Indigent person" means any person who meets one 4    or more of the following criteria:5            (i) He or she is receiving assistance under one or 6        more of the following means-based governmental public 7        benefits programs: Supplemental Security Income (SSI), 8        Aid to the Aged, Blind and Disabled (AABD), Temporary 9        Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), Supplemental 10        Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), General 11        Assistance, Transitional Assistance, or State Children 12        and Family Assistance.13            (ii) His or her available personal income is 125% 14        or less of the current poverty level, unless the 15        applicant's assets that are not exempt under Part 9 or 16        10 of Article XII of this Code are of a nature and 17        value that the court determines that the applicant is 18        able to pay the fees, costs, and charges.19            (iii) He or she is, in the discretion of the court, 20        unable to proceed in an action without payment of 21        fees, costs, and charges and whose payment of those 22        fees, costs, and charges would result in substantial 23        hardship to the person or his or her family.24            (iv) He or she is an indigent person pursuant to 25        Section 5-105.5 of this Code.26        (3) "Poverty level" means the current poverty level as   HB4092- 3 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1    established by the United States Department of Health and 2    Human Services. 3    (b) On the application of any person, before or after the 4commencement of an action:5        (1) If the court finds that the applicant is an 6    indigent person, the court shall grant the applicant a 7    full fees, costs, and charges waiver entitling him or her 8    to sue or defend the action without payment of any of the 9    fees, costs, and charges.10        (2) If the court finds that the applicant satisfies 11    any of the criteria contained in items (i), (ii), or (iii) 12    of this subdivision (b)(2), the court shall grant the 13    applicant a partial fees, costs, and charges waiver 14    entitling him or her to sue or defend the action upon 15    payment of the applicable percentage of the assessments, 16    costs, and charges of the action, as follows:17            (i) the court shall waive 75% of all fees, costs, 18        and charges if the available income of the applicant 19        is greater than 125% but does not exceed 150% of the 20        poverty level, unless the assets of the applicant that 21        are not exempt under Part 9 or 10 of Article XII of 22        this Code are such that the applicant is able, without 23        undue hardship, to pay a greater portion of the fees, 24        costs, and charges;25            (ii) the court shall waive 50% of all fees, costs, 26        and charges if the available income is greater than   HB4092- 4 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1        150% but does not exceed 175% of the poverty level, 2        unless the assets of the applicant that are not exempt 3        under Part 9 or 10 of Article XII of this Code are such 4        that the applicant is able, without undue hardship, to 5        pay a greater portion of the fees, costs, and charges; 6        and7            (iii) the court shall waive 25% of all fees, 8        costs, and charges if the available income of the 9        applicant is greater than 175% but does not exceed 10        200% of the current poverty level, unless the assets 11        of the applicant that are not exempt under Part 9 or 10 12        of Article XII of this Code are such that the applicant 13        is able, without undue hardship, to pay a greater 14        portion of the fees, costs, and charges.15    (c) An application for waiver of court fees, costs, and 16charges shall be in writing and signed by the applicant, or, if 17the applicant is a minor or an incompetent adult, by another 18person having knowledge of the facts. The contents of the 19application for waiver of court fees, costs, and charges, and 20the procedure for the decision of the applications, shall be 21established by Supreme Court Rule. Factors to consider in 22evaluating an application shall include:23        (1) the applicant's receipt of needs based 24    governmental public benefits, including Supplemental 25    Security Income (SSI); Aid to the Aged, Blind and Disabled 26    (AABD); Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF);   HB4092- 5 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1    Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP or "food 2    stamps"); General Assistance; Transitional Assistance; or 3    State Children and Family Assistance;4        (2) the employment status of the applicant and amount 5    of monthly income, if any;6        (3) income received from the applicant's pension, 7    Social Security benefits, unemployment benefits, and other 8    sources;9        (4) income received by the applicant from other 10    household members;11        (5) the applicant's monthly expenses, including rent, 12    home mortgage, other mortgage, utilities, food, medical, 13    vehicle, childcare, debts, child support, and other 14    expenses; and15        (6) financial affidavits or other similar supporting 16    documentation provided by the applicant showing that 17    payment of the imposed fees, costs, and charges would 18    result in substantial hardship to the applicant or the 19    applicant's family.20    (c-5) The court shall provide, through the office of the 21clerk of the court, the application for waiver of court fees, 22costs, and charges to any person seeking to sue or defend an 23action who indicates an inability to pay the fees, costs, and 24charges of the action. The clerk of the court shall post in a 25conspicuous place in the courthouse a notice no smaller than 268.5 x 11 inches, using no smaller than 30-point typeface   HB4092- 6 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1printed in English and in Spanish, advising the public that 2they may ask the court for permission to sue or defend a civil 3action without payment of fees, costs, and charges. The notice 4shall be substantially as follows:5        "If you are unable to pay the fees, costs, and charges 6    of an action you may ask the court to allow you to proceed 7    without paying them. Ask the clerk of the court for 8    forms."9    (d) (Blank).10    (e) The clerk of the court shall not refuse to accept and 11file any complaint, appearance, or other paper presented by 12the applicant if accompanied by an application for waiver of 13court fees, costs, and charges, and those papers shall be 14considered filed on the date the application is presented. If 15the application is denied or a partial fees, costs, and 16charges waiver is granted, the order shall state a date 17certain by which the necessary fees, costs, and charges must 18be paid. For good cause shown, the court may allow an applicant 19who receives a partial fees, costs, and charges waiver to 20defer payment of fees, costs, and charges, make installment 21payments, or make payment upon reasonable terms and conditions 22stated in the order. The court may dismiss the claims or strike 23the defenses of any party failing to pay the fees, costs, and 24charges within the time and in the manner ordered by the court. 25A judicial ruling on an application for waiver of court 26assessments does not constitute a decision of a substantial   HB4092- 7 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1issue in the case under Section 2-1001 of this Code.2    (f) The order granting a full or partial fees, costs, and 3charges waiver shall expire after one year. Upon expiration of 4the waiver, or a reasonable period of time before expiration, 5the party whose fees, costs, and charges were waived may file 6another application for waiver and the court shall consider 7the application in accordance with the applicable Supreme 8Court Rule.9    (f-5) If, before or at the time of final disposition of the 10case, the court obtains information, including information 11from the court file, suggesting that a person whose fees, 12costs, and charges were initially waived was not entitled to a 13full or partial waiver at the time of application, the court 14may require the person to appear at a court hearing by giving 15the applicant no less than 10 days' written notice of the 16hearing and the specific reasons why the initial waiver might 17be reconsidered. The court may require the applicant to 18provide reasonably available evidence, including financial 19information, to support his or her eligibility for the waiver, 20but the court shall not require submission of information that 21is unrelated to the criteria for eligibility and application 22requirements set forth in subdivision (b)(1) or (b)(2) of this 23Section. If the court finds that the person was not initially 24entitled to any waiver, the person shall pay all fees, costs, 25and charges relating to the civil action, including any 26previously waived fees, costs, and charges. The order may   HB4092- 8 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1state terms of payment in accordance with subsection (e). The 2court shall not conduct a hearing under this subsection more 3often than once every 6 months.4    (f-10) If, before or at the time of final disposition of 5the case, the court obtains information, including information 6from the court file, suggesting that a person who received a 7full or partial waiver has experienced a change in financial 8condition so that he or she is no longer eligible for that 9waiver, the court may require the person to appear at a court 10hearing by giving the applicant no less than 10 days' written 11notice of the hearing and the specific reasons why the waiver 12might be reconsidered. The court may require the person to 13provide reasonably available evidence, including financial 14information, to support his or her continued eligibility for 15the waiver, but shall not require submission of information 16that is unrelated to the criteria for eligibility and 17application requirements set forth in subdivisions (b)(1) and 18(b)(2) of this Section. If the court enters an order finding 19that the person is no longer entitled to a waiver, or is 20entitled to a partial waiver different than that which the 21person had previously received, the person shall pay the 22requisite fees, costs, and charges from the date of the order 23going forward. The order may state terms of payment in 24accordance with subsection (e) of this Section. The court 25shall not conduct a hearing under this subsection more often 26than once every 6 months.   HB4092- 9 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1    (g) A court, in its discretion, may appoint counsel to 2represent an indigent person, and that counsel shall perform 3his or her duties without fees, charges, or reward.4    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to affect 5the right of a party to sue or defend an action in forma 6pauperis without the payment of fees, costs, charges, or the 7right of a party to court-appointed counsel, as authorized by 8any other provision of law or by the rules of the Illinois 9Supreme Court. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 10limit the authority of a court to order another party to the 11action to pay the fees, costs, and charges of the action. 12    (h-5) If a party is represented by a civil legal services 13provider or an attorney in a court-sponsored pro bono program 14as defined in Section 5-105.5 of this Code, the attorney 15representing that party shall file a certification with the 16court in accordance with Supreme Court Rule 298 and that party 17shall be allowed to sue or defend without payment of fees, 18costs, and charges without filing an application under this 19Section.20    (h-10) (Blank). 21    (h-15) Any party seeking a waiver of fees, costs, or 22charges or seeking to use a previously ordered waiver of fees, 23costs, or charges shall provide proper notice to all other 24parties and attorneys of record prior to presenting the 25application for the waiver of fees, costs, or charges to the 26court and the court shall not enter an order for a waiver of   HB4092- 10 -LRB104 14518 LNS 27658 b1fees, costs, or charges unless the applicant shows proof of 2proper notice. The waiver of fees, costs, or charges 3authorized by this subsection shall not automatically apply to 4fees, costs, or charges ordered or required to be paid for 5attorney's fees and costs incurred by an individual appointed 6under Section 506 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 7Marriage Act, any evaluation costs under Section 604 of the 8Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, or any 9counseling costs ordered under Section 607.6 of the Illinois 10Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act but shall instead be 11considered by the court in each individual case. 12    (i) The provisions of this Section are severable under 13Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.14(Source: P.A. 101-36, eff. 6-28-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.